Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.220

Rules, classifications, and forms.

The state auditor may make such rules, classifications, and forms as may be necessary to carry out the provisions in respect to county budgets, define what expenditures shall be chargeable to each budget account, and establish such accounting and cost systems as may be necessary to provide accurate budget information.

[ 1995 c 301 s 65; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.220. Prior: 1923 c 164 s 8; RRS s 3997-8.]